District of Columbia statutes.
9-1208.01

Streetcar plan.

The Mayor shall submit to the Council a comprehensive plan for financing, operations, and necessary capital facilities of the Streetcar Project, along with a proposed resolution for approval of the plan, for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the plan, in whole or in part, by resolution, within this 45-day review period, the proposed plan shall be deemed approved.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 7065(a), 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7065(a) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
Resolution 18-680, the “Streetcar Project Comprehensive Plan Approval Resolution of 2010”, was approved effective December 7, 2010.